Nevada, session 83, SB266.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 226.454 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.454 “Provider of health care” means:
1. A physician;
2. A physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or
633 of NRS;
3. A dentist;
4. A licensed nurse;
5. A person who holds a license as an attendant or is certified
as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS;
6. An optometrist;
7. An audiologist;
8. A practitioner of respiratory care;
9. A podiatric physician;
10. A psychologist;
11. A clinical professional counselor;
12. A marriage and family therapist;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
13. A clinical alcohol and drug counselor or a licensed or
certified alcohol and drug counselor;
14. A perfusionist;
[13.] 15. A pharmacist or pharmacy technician;
[14.] 16. An associate in social work, a social worker, a master
social worker, an independent social worker or a clinical social
worker licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
[15.] 17. A midwife; or
[16.] 18. A provider of doula services who is enrolled with the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of
Health and Human Services to receive reimbursement through
Medicaid pursuant to NRS 422.27177.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)